New Mexico, session 2026, SB116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 7-2-5.13 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2022, Chapter 47, Section 6, as amended) is amended to read: "7-2-5.13. EXEMPTION--[ARMED FORCES] UNIFORMED SERVICES RETIREMENT PAY.-- A. An individual who is [an armed forces] a uniformed services retiree or the surviving spouse of [an armed forces] a uniformed services retiree may claim an exemption in [an amount equal to thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) of armed forces] the amount of the retiree's uniformed services retirement pay includable, except for this exemption, in net income. B. As used in this section: (1) "uniformed service" means: (a) active and reserve components of the army, navy, air force, space force, marine corps or coast guard of the United States; (b) the United States merchant marine; (c) the commissioned corps of the United States public health service; (d) the commissioned corps of the national oceanic and atmospheric administration of the United States; or (e) the national guard of a state; and (2) "[armed forces] uniformed services retiree" means a former member of the [armed forces] uniformed services of the United States who has qualified by years of service or disability to separate from [military] uniformed service with lifetime benefits." SECTION 2. APPLICABILITY.--The provisions of this act apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027. - 2 -